California, session 20252026, SB289.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 15.6 (commencing with Section 67388) is added to Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 15.6. Gender and Sex Discrimination Educational Oversight Office67388. (a) The Attorney General shall establish a statewide Gender and Sex Discrimination Educational Oversight Office.(1) The office shall serve as a point of contact for students who are dissatisfied with their campus-based policies or investigative procedures designed to prevent or address incidents of harassment, rape, sexual assault, and violence, including, but not limited to, sex and gender discrimination, at their respective campuses.(2) The office shall receive complaints from students regarding the students’ campuses’ noncompliance with any aspect of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.), and state law policies.(3) The office may establish a process to investigate campus-based policies and investigative procedures relating to harassment, rape, sexual assault, and violence complaints filed pursuant to paragraph (2).(4) The office shall receive an annual deidentified report on the total number of, the campus-based investigative timeliness for, and the outcomes of, campus-based investigations regarding whether criminal charges were filed for, and the outcomes of criminal proceedings regarding, incidents of harassment, rape, sexual assault, and violence that involve students who are enrolled at a campus of a community college district, the California State University, an independent postsecondary educational institution, or the University of California. The office may investigate those institutions’ policies, procedures, or campus-based investigations following an incident of harassment, rape, sexual assault, or violence and make recommendations to the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney, as appropriate, to the extent doing so complies with state and federal law.(b) The governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the governing board of each independent postsecondary educational institution, and the Regents of the University of California shall annually report to the office each incident of harassment, rape, sexual assault, and violence that involves one or more of their respective enrolled students, the number of those incidents that were investigated by the institution, the timelines and outcomes of those investigations, the sanctions that were imposed by the institution on students who were involved, whether criminal charges were filed as to those incidents, and the outcomes of those criminal proceedings for purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact future legislation to establish a statewide Title IX oversight office that would, among other things, serve as a point of contact for students who are dissatisfied with campus-based policies or investigative procedures designed to prevent or address incidents of rape or sexual assault.